Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 4

Boards of Election Commissioners and Other Election Officers

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 11, § 3: approved Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the error corrected by this act causes great confusion in the preparation for an election; that an election is being prepared for at this time and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 4: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present requirements that primary election officials reside in the ward or voting precinct in which such official is appointed to serve is unreasonably restrictive and may result in it being very difficult to obtain election officials to conduct primary elections in this state and that it is essential to the proper and efficient conduct of such election that this requirement be removed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 157, § 10: Feb. 20, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws of the state, that separate or common polling places cannot be established by county committees in counties using voting machines without attendant substantial costs; that it is essential to the proper and economical administration of the election laws of this state that legislation be enacted immediately to provide that respective county committees or county elections commissions in counties using voting machines may designate separate and/or common polling places where all elections can be held and to provide for a minimum number of election officials to serve at such polling places so that substantial economies can be realized in the conduct of such elections. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 783, § 6: Mar. 28, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the efficient and proper conduct of elections in this state is essential to our form of representative government, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to reorganize the membership of the State Board of Election Commissioners and to establish a Citizens Election Advisory Council to plan and supervise the conduct of elections and to recommend laws to strengthen the state's election process. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 403, § 4: Mar. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present per diem prescribed by law for the county board of election commissioners was established in 1969 and there has been some difference of opinion concerning whether the per diem prescribed in Section 7 of Article 5 of Act 465 of 1969 was intended as a fixed per diem or merely a minimum per diem to be paid members of the county board of election commissioners; that it is the purpose of this act to permit the increase of the per diem prescribed by law for members of the county board of election commissioners and to ratify and confirm the payment of a per diem in excess of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per day to county boards of election commissioners prior to the effective date of this act, and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 522, § 5: Mar. 14, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that by law the county chairman of the county committee of the majority party and the minority party are members of the county board of election commissioners; that in some instances these persons are also elected officials; that it constitutes at least the appearance of a conflict of interest for the county chairmen, when also elected officials, to serve on the county board of election commissioners; that this Act will prohibit them from serving and therefore avoid the appearance of a conflict of interest; and that until this Act becomes effective the possibility of the conflict of interest will continue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 760, § 5: Mar. 26, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law does not allow a member of the County Board of Election Commissioners to fill a vacancy in an elective office without vacating his seat on the commission; that such law is inequitable and denies the citizens of this state the service of highly qualified people; that this act corrects the inequity; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to allow the citizens the service of qualified people who are otherwise unable to serve. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 349 and 352, § 7: Feb. 17, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there now exists a vacancy on the Ethics Commission due to a decision by the Arkansas Supreme Court that invalidated the Chief Justice's appointment of a member of the commission; that this vacancy should be filled as soon as possible; and that this act establishes the mechanism for filling that vacancy and therefore should be placed into effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 709, § 21: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1217, § 12: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1174, § 2: Mar. 29, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that four of the terms will expire prior to the implementation of this act and as a result the State Board of Election Commissioners will lose a majority of its current membership, resulting in a loss of continuity and experience. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 376, § 14: Mar. 8, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends the process for circulating initiative petitions and referendum petitions; and that the provisions of this act should become effective immediately so that its provisions apply to all petitions circulated after the passage of the act to avoid confusion in petition circulation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”. The emergency clause for Acts 2019, No. 376 was held to be defective in Safe Surgery Ark. v. Thurston, 2019 Ark. 403.

7-4-101. State Board of Election Commissioners — Members — Officers — Meetings.

(a)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall be composed of the following seven (7) persons, with at least one (1) from each congressional district:

(1)

The Secretary of State;

(2)

One (1) person designated by the chair of the state Democratic Party;

(3)

One (1) person designated by the chair of the state Republican Party;

(4)

One (1) person to be chosen by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

(5)

One (1) person to be chosen by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

(6)

Two (2) persons to be chosen by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be a county clerk and one (1) of whom shall have served for at least three (3) years as a county election commissioner.

(b)

The Secretary of State shall serve as the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners and the Secretary of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(c)

Except for the Secretary of State and the county clerk, no member of the State Board of Election Commissioners shall be an elected public official.

(d)(1)

The term on the State Board of Election Commissioners of the Secretary of State shall be concurrent with his or her term in office.

(2)

The county clerk shall hold the office of county clerk when appointed to the State Board of Election Commissioners and shall be removed as a member of the State Board of Election Commissioners if not in office.

(3)(A)

Members of the State Board of Election Commissioners appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years and shall continue to serve until successors have been appointed and taken the official oath.

(B)

All other appointive members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years and shall continue to serve until successors have been appointed and taken the official oath.

(4)

No appointive member shall be appointed to serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms.

(5)(A)

If a vacancy on the State Board of Election Commissioners occurs, a successor shall be appointed within thirty (30) days to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(B)

The appointment shall be made by the official holding the office responsible for appointing the predecessor.

(e)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall meet as needed upon call of the chair or upon written request to the chair of any four (4) members.

(2)

A majority of the membership of the State Board of Election Commissioners shall constitute a quorum for conducting business.

(3)

No sanctions shall be imposed without the affirmative vote of at least four (4) members of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(4)

A meeting of the State Board of Election Commissioners may be chaired and conducted by:

(A)

The Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners; or

(B)(i)

A person designated by the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners to act as chair for the meeting.

(ii)

If a person is designated by the Chair of the State Board of Election Commissioners under subdivision (e)(4)(B)(i) of this section:

(a)

The designated person's presence shall count for a quorum to conduct business; and

(b)

The designated person may vote in the meeting.

(f)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall have the authority to:

(1)

Publish a candidate's election handbook, in conjunction with the office of the Secretary of State and the Arkansas Ethics Commission, which outlines in a readable and understandable format the legal obligations of a candidate and any other suggestions that might be helpful to a candidate in complying with state election law;

(2)

Conduct statewide training for election officers and county election commissioners;

(3)

Adopt all necessary rules regarding training referred to in subdivision (f)(2) of this section and develop procedures for monitoring attendance;

(4)

Monitor all election law-related legislation;

(5)

Formulate, adopt, and promulgate all necessary rules to assure even and consistent application of voter registration laws and fair and orderly election procedures;

(6)(A)

Appoint at least one (1) certified election monitor to a county upon a signed, written request under oath filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners and a determination by the State Board of Election Commissioners that appointing a monitor is necessary.

(B)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall certify at least one (1) election monitor in each congressional district.

(C)

Certified election monitors shall serve as observers for the purpose of reporting to the State Board of Election Commissioners on the conduct of the election.

(D)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may allow for reasonable compensation for election monitors;

(7)

Assist the county board of election commissioners in the performance of administrative duties of the election process if the State Board of Election Commissioners determines that assistance is necessary and appropriate;

(8)(A)

Formulate, adopt, and promulgate all necessary rules to establish uniform and nondiscriminatory administrative complaint procedures consistent with the requirements of Title IV of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

(B)

The cost of compliance with Title IV of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 shall be paid from the fund established to comply with the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002;

(9)

Investigate alleged violations, render findings, and impose disciplinary action according to §7-4-120 for violations of election and voter registration laws, except as to §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7), and except for any matters relating to campaign finance and disclosure laws which the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall have the power and authority to enforce according to §§7-6-217 and7-6-218;

(10)

Examine and approve in accordance with §§7-5-503 and7-5-606 the types of voting machines and electronic vote tabulating devices used in any election;

(11)

Administer reimbursement of election expenses to counties in accordance with §7-7-201(a) for primary elections, statewide special elections, and nonpartisan general elections;

(12)

Consider the certification of the ballot title and popular name submitted on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition under §7-9-111;

(13)

Conduct post-election audits under §7-4-121; and

(14)

Formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules to establish procedures for post-election audits conducted under §7-4-121.

(g)

The Attorney General shall provide legal assistance to the State Board of Election Commissioners in answering questions regarding election laws.

(h)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may appoint a Director of the State Board of Election Commissioners, who may hire a staff.

(2)

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(3)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall set the personnel policies in accordance with the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, §§19-4-1601 and21-5-101, and the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, §§ 2, 3; 1977, No. 783, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-502, 3-503; Acts 1993, No. 1092, § 1; 1995, No. 349, § 3; 1995, No. 352, § 3; 1995, No. 741, § 1; 1995, No. 929, § 1; 1995, No. 940, § 1; 1995, No. 1217, § 5; 1997, No. 647, § 1; 1999, No. 997, § 1; 2001, No. 1174, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 14; 2003, No. 1161, § 1; 2005, No. 1827, § 1; 2007, No. 559, § 1; 2009, No. 250, § 2; 2013, No. 977, § 1; 2013, No. 1110, § 2; 2013, No. 1456, § 1; 2019, No. 376, § 2; 2019, No. 888, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1995, Nos. 741, 929, 940, and 1214. Subsection (f) of this section was also amended by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 349 and 352, § 3, to read as follows:

“(f)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may perform the following duties:

“(1)

Publish a ‘plain English’ election handbook which addresses the ‘do's and dont's’ for candidates under Arkansas law;

“(2)

Conduct statewide training for election clerks and judges and county election commissioners;

“(3)

Monitor all election law-related legislation;

“(4)

Conduct investigations of citizen complaints and issue advisory opinions regarding violations of election laws, except as to §7-1-103(1) — (4), (6), (7), and (8), or except for any matter relating to campaign finance and disclosure laws, which the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall have the same power and authority to enforce as is provided the commission under §§7-6-217 and7-6-218 for the enforcement of campaign finance laws;

“(5)

To develop procedures for receiving citizen complaints which are referred to in subdivision (f)(4) of this section;

“(6)

Establish guidelines for and monitor the qualifications of all election officials; and

“(7)

Formulate, adopt, and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations to assure even and consistent application of fair and orderly election procedures.”

Section7-4-120, enacted by Acts 2015, No. 1253 replaced
§7-4-118 [repealed].

Acts 2020, No. 21, § 7, provided: “TRANSFER OF FUNDS.

If the State Board of Election Commissioners is required to pay the expenses for any state supported preferential primary election, general primary election, nonpartisan general election, statewide special election or special primary election and funds are not available to pay for such elections, the Director of the State Board of Election Commissioners shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount needed to pay the expenses of the election(s). Upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the amount certified shall be transferred from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account of the State Board of Election Commissioners. All unused funds transferred under this provision shall be transferred back to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund at the end of each fiscal year. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall initiate the necessary transfer documents to reflect all such transfers upon the fiscal records of the State Auditor, the State Treasurer and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021”.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Secretary of State” for “elected state official” in (d)(1), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment by No. 977 rewrote (e)(4).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1110 deleted “judicial” following “nonpartisan” in (f)(11).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1456 inserted “at least one (1)” in (f)(6)(A); and inserted (f)(6)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment by No. 376 added (f)(12).

The 2019 amendment by No. 888 added (f)(13) and (f)(14).

U.S. Code.

The Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in (f)(8), is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20901 et seq.

7-4-102. County boards of election commissioners — Election of members — Oath.

(a)(1)(A)

In January of each odd-numbered year following the election of county committee officers, members of the county board of election commissioners shall be elected by their respective county committees.

(B)

A chair or secretary of a county political party shall not serve as a member of the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

The membership of the county board of election commissioners shall be as follows:

(A)

Two (2) members elected by the county committee of the majority party; and

(B)

One (1) member elected by the county committee of the minority party.

(b)(1)

Within ten (10) days of the date of selection to the county board of election commissioners, the chair or secretary of each county committee shall notify the county clerk in writing of the names and addresses of those selected to serve on the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

Upon receipt of the notice, the county clerk shall send to each of the county election commissioners, by registered mail, notice to appear before the clerk within thirty (30) days of selection as a county election commissioner to take and subscribe to the oath prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution.

(3)

The oath shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and a duplicate forwarded to the Secretary of State.

(c)

As soon as practicable following the election of members to the county board of election commissioners, the chair of the majority party of the county shall file with the county clerk and the Secretary of State a notice setting forth the names of the majority party's designated members of the county board of election commissioners, and the chair of the minority party shall file with the county clerk and the Secretary of State a notice setting forth the name of the minority party's member of the county board of election commissioners.

(d)

The county board of election commissioners is deemed to consist of county officials, and its members shall be immune from tort liability pursuant to §21-9-301.

(e)

A member of the county board of election commissioners shall serve at the pleasure of his or her respective county committee, and a county committee may remove a member of the county board of election commissioners representing the county committee by majority vote of the county committee.

(f)(1)

A vacancy on the county board of election commissioners shall be filled by the election of a new member by the county committee of the appropriate party.

(2)(A)

The county committee shall elect a new member within forty-five (45) days of a vacancy.

(B)

If the county committee fails to elect a new member within forty-five (45) days of a vacancy, the state chair of the appropriate party shall appoint a new member to the county board of election commissioners.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-502; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 4; 1989, No. 522, § 1; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 73, § 1; 1993, No. 843, § 1; 1995, No. 1014, § 1; 1997, No. 647, § 2; 1999, No. 1422, § 2; 2007, No. 489, § 1; 2007, No. 559, § 2; 2011, No. 1056, § 1; 2019, No. 966, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2011, No. 1056, §
3, provided: “A member of a county board of election commissioners serving as of the effective date of this act shall continue to serve on the county board until his or her successor is selected by his or her respective county committee.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 489 added present (e).

The 2007 amendment by No. 559 substituted “selected by the county committee of the majority party at the same time as the election of party officers” for “to be appointed by the State Board of Election Commissioners” in (a)(1); redesignated former (a)(2)(A) as present (a)(2); substituted “select a resident of the county qualified” for “elect someone” in (a)(2); deleted (a)(2)(B); substituted “select a resident of the county qualified” for “appoint someone” in (a)(3); deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote present (b); and rewrote present (c).

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a); substituted “As soon as practicable, following the election of members to the county board” for “Between January 1 and January 31 of each year” in (c); rewrote (e); and added (f).

The 2019 amendment added the (a)(1)(A) designation; and added (a)(1)(B).

7-4-103. Vacancy or disqualification of state or county chair.

In the event of a vacancy or disqualification on the part of any state or county chair for either the majority party or a minority party, the state vice chair or county vice chair of the party in which the vacancy occurs shall act as county chair or state chair, as the case may be, for all of the purposes set out in §7-4-101 and this section until a new county chair or state chair is selected by the parties.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, §§ 2, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-502, 3-505; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 6; 1995, No. 1014, § 2; 2001, No. 794, § 1; 2011, No. 1056, § 2; 2013, No. 1154, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2011, No. 1056, § 3, provided: “A member of a county board of election commissioners serving as of the effective date of this act shall continue to serve on the county board until his or her successor is selected by his or her respective county committee.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “7-4-103” following “§7-4-101” in (a); deleted the last sentence in (b); and deleted (c).

The 2013 amendment deleted (b).

7-4-104. Lists of county chairs — Notification of vacancies.

(a)(1)

It shall be the duty of the majority and minority parties to keep on file with their respective state chair a complete list of all of their respective county chairs.

(2)

It shall be the duty of the respective county chairs of both the majority and minority parties to keep on file with the Secretary of State a letter stating the name of the county chairs and to notify promptly the Secretary of State of the death, resignation, disqualification, or vacancy in the office of any county chair and of the election of a new chair to fill the vacancy thus created.

(b)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to keep the letters containing the names of the county chairs of the majority and minority parties as public records open at all times to public inspection.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-505; Acts 1997, No. 647, § 3; 2001, No. 475, § 1.

7-4-105. County board of election commissioners — Officers — Meetings.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall hold office until their successors are appointed and qualified. The commissioners shall meet no later than February 28 of odd-numbered years and shall organize themselves into a county board of election commissioners by electing one (1) member chair. Each commissioner shall have one (1) vote. Two (2) commissioners shall constitute a quorum, and the concurring votes of any two (2) shall decide questions before them unless otherwise provided by law.

(b)

The chair of a county board of election commissioners shall notify all commissioners of all meetings. Any meeting of two (2) or more commissioners when official business is conducted shall be public and held pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq. The county board of election commissioners shall keep minutes of all meetings when official business is conducted, and the minutes shall be filed of record with the county clerk within the sooner of:

(1)

One hundred twenty (120) days of a meeting; or

(2)

Ten (10) days of the following meeting.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 6; 1971, No. 261, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-506; Acts 1997, No. 647, § 4; 2015, No. 1042, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “no later than February 28 of odd-numbered years” for “at the courthouse at least thirty (30) days prior to the general election” in the second sentence of (a); and added “within the sooner of: (1)
One hundred twenty (120) days of a meeting; or (2)
Ten (10) days of the following meeting” in (b).

7-4-106. Assistance of prosecuting attorney.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners, as created by this subchapter, may call upon the prosecuting attorney or his or her deputy for legal opinions, advice, or assistance in defending, commencing, or appealing civil actions at law and equity.

(b)

The county or prosecuting attorney shall defend any civil lawsuit brought against the county board of election commissioners or its members if they are sued in regard to acts or omissions made during the course of their official duties.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 527, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-506.1; Acts 1993, No. 780, § 1.

7-4-107. Duties of county board of election commissioners.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall:

(1)

Ensure compliance with all legal requirements relating to the conduct of elections;

(2)

Exercise its duties consistent with the training and materials provided by the State Board of Election Commissioners;

(3)

Allocate a sufficient number of secure ballot boxes if voting is conducted using preprinted paper ballots for each polling site based on the number of votes cast at that polling site in the immediately preceding:

(A)

Preferential primary election or general election if the election for which the secure ballot boxes are prepared is a preferential primary election or general election; and

(B)

Special election if the election for which the secure ballot boxes are prepared is a special election;

(4)

Allocate sufficient components of a voting system approved for use under §7-5-301 for each polling site based on the number of votes cast at that polling site in the immediately preceding:

(A)

Preferential primary election or general election if the election for which the components are prepared is a preferential primary election or general election; and

(B)

Special election if the election for which the components are prepared is a special election; and

(5)

Appoint the requisite number of election officials at each site where voters present themselves to vote to ensure that there is a sufficient number of election officials at each site, based upon the votes in the immediately preceding comparable election.

(b)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall select and appoint a sufficient number of election officials for each polling site as provided by subsection (a) of this section and perform the other duties prescribed not less than twenty (20) days preceding an election.

(2)(A)

Each polling site shall have a minimum of two (2) election clerks, one (1) election judge, and one (1) election sheriff.

(B)

The election judge shall serve as the poll supervisor.

(C)(i)

All election officials at a polling site shall have completed training under §7-4-109 within the twelve (12) months before the election.

(ii)

The minority party election commissioner shall have the option to designate a number of election officials equal to one (1) less than the majority of election officials at each polling site, with a minimum of two (2) election officials at each polling site.

(iii)

In the event that the county party representatives on the county board of election commissioners fail to agree upon any election official to fill an election post allotted to the respective party twenty (20) days before the election, the county board of election commissioners shall appoint the remaining election officials.

(c)

The county board of election commissioners may permit election officials to work half-day or split shifts at the polls at any election so long as the requisite number of election officials is always present.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 6 and Art. 7, § 3; 1971, No. 261, § 9; 1973, No. 157, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-506, 3-703; Acts 1993, No. 511, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 647, § 5; 1999, No. 1490, § 2; 2001, No. 562, § 1; 2001, No. 1822, § 2; 2005, No. 894, § 1; 2005, No. 1827, § 2; 2007, No. 222, § 3; 2007, No. 559, § 3; 2013, No. 1457, § 1; 2019, No. 966, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 222 redesignated former (b)(1)(B) as present (b)(2) and made a related change; and deleted former (b)(2) and (b)(3).

The 2007 amendment by No. 559 deleted former (e).

The 2013 amendment inserted “all election officials at a polling site shall have completed training under §7-4-109, and” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “Ballot boxes — Voting booths — Appointment of election officers” in the section heading; rewrote (a); substituted “The county board of election commissioners shall select” for “It shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to select” in (b)(1); added the (b)(2)(A) designation; inserted (b)(2)(B); rewrote the former second sentence of (b)(2) as (b)(2)(C)(i); added the (b)(2)(C)(ii) and (iii) designations; deleted former (c); and redesignated former (d) as (c).

7-4-108. Absence of election officials — Filling vacancy.

(a)

If any election official is absent at the time fixed for the opening of the polls, the election judge shall immediately notify the county board of election commissioners of the vacancy.

(b)

If the county board of election commissioners does not timely appoint a new election official, and fewer than three (3) election officials are present at the opening of the polls, the election judge present shall appoint one (1) or more qualified persons to act as an election official until the county board of election commissioners appoints a new election official.

(c)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, upon notification of the absent election official, at least one (1) member of the county board of election commissioners shall respond to the polling site and assist with the election until the new election official is appointed.

(2)

If all three (3) of the members of the county board of election commissioners are assisting at other polling sites and the election judge does not timely appoint a qualified person, the other election officials present at the polling site shall appoint a qualified person to act as an election official until the county board of election commissioners appoints a new election official.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-703; Acts 1997, No. 647, § 6; 2019, No. 966, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added the (a) designation; rewrote (a); and added (b) and (c).